Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.077

Gambling commission—Vacation of certain suspensions upon payment of monetary penalty.

The commission, when suspending any license for a period of thirty days or less, may further provide in the order of suspension that such suspension shall be vacated upon payment to the commission of a monetary penalty in an amount then fixed by the commission.

[ 1981 c 139 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.